cs: Typ vzoru řazení: 10rychlostní; 5rychlostní; 6rychlostní; 7rychlostní; 8rychlostní; Automat PRND; Automat PRNDL; Automat PRNDM; Prázdné (bez schématu); Jiné
es: Tipo de patrón de cambio: 10 velocidades; 5 velocidades; 6 velocidades; 7 velocidades; 8 velocidades; Automático PRND; Automático PRNDL; Automático PRNDM; En blanco (sin patrón de cambios); Otro
nb: Girmønstertype: 10-trinns; 5-trinns; 6-trinns; 7-trinns; 8-trinns; Automatisk PRND; Automatisk PRNDL; Automatisk PRNDM; Blank (uten girmønster); Annet
vi: Kiểu bố trí cần số: 10 tốc độ; 5 tốc độ; 6 tốc độ; 7 tốc độ; 8 tốc độ; Số tự động PRND; Số tự động PRNDL; Số tự động PRNDM; Trống (không có sơ đồ sang số); Khác
zh-CN: 挡位图样式: 10 速; 5 速; 6 速; 7 速; 8 速; 自动挡 PRND; 自动挡 PRNDL; 自动挡 PRNDM; 空白（无档位图案）; 其他
fi: Vaihtokuvion tyyppi: 10-vaihteinen; 5-vaihteinen; 6-vaihteinen; 7-vaihteinen; 8-vaihteinen; Automaattinen PRND; Automaattinen PRNDL; Automaattinen PRNDM; Tyhjä (ei vaihdekaaviota); Muu
pt-PT: Tipo de padrão de mudanças: 10 velocidades; 5 velocidades; 6 velocidades; 7 velocidades; 8 velocidades; Automático PRND; Automático PRNDL; Automático PRNDM; Em branco (sem padrão de mudanças); Outro
sv: Typ av växelmönster: 10-växlad; 5-växlad; 6-växlad; 7-växlad; 8-växlad; Automatisk PRND; Automatisk PRNDL; Automatisk PRNDM; Tom (inget växelmönster); Övrigt
th: ประเภทรูปแบบการเปลี่ยนเกียร์: 10 สปีด; 5 สปีด; 6 สปีด; 7 สปีด; 8 สปีด; อัตโนมัติ PRND; อัตโนมัติ PRNDL; อัตโนมัติ PRNDM; ว่าง (ไม่มีรูปแบบเกียร์); อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 排檔圖案類型: 10 速; 5 速; 6 速; 7 速; 8 速; 自排 PRND; 自排 PRNDL; 自排 PRNDM; 空白 (無換檔圖案); 其他
el: Τύπος μοτίβου ταχυτήτων: 10 ταχυτήτων; 5 ταχυτήτων; 6 ταχυτήτων; 7 ταχυτήτων; 8 ταχυτήτων; Αυτόματο PRND; Αυτόματο PRNDL; Αυτόματο PRNDM; Κενό (χωρίς μοτίβο ταχυτήτων); Άλλο
pl: Typ wzoru zmiany biegów: 10 biegów; 5 biegów; 6 biegów; 7 biegów; 8 biegów; Automatyczna PRND; Automatyczna PRNDL; Automatyczna PRNDM; Pusty (bez układu biegów); Inne
sk-SK: Typ vzoru radenia prevodových stupňov: 10-stupňová; 5-stupňová; 6-stupňová; 7-stupňová; 8-stupňová; Automatická PRND; Automatická PRNDL; Automatická PRNDM; Prázdne (bez schémy radenia); Iné
bg-BG: Тип схема на скоростите: 10-скоростна; 5-скоростна; 6-скоростна; 7-скоростна; 8-скоростна; Автоматична PRND; Автоматична PRNDL; Автоматична PRNDM; Празна (без схема на предавките); Друго
da: Gearmønstertype: 10 gear; 5 gear; 6 gear; 7 gear; 8 gear; Automatgear PRND; Automatgear PRNDL; Automatgear PRNDM; Blank (intet gearmønster); Andet
ro-RO: Tip de model al treptelor de viteză: 10 trepte; 5 trepte; 6 trepte; 7 trepte; 8 trepte; Automat PRND; Automat PRNDL; Automat PRNDM; Simplă (fără diagramă a treptelor); Altele
ja: シフトパターンタイプ: 10速; 5速; 6速; 7速; 8速; オートマチックPRND; オートマチックPRNDL; オートマチックPRNDM; 無地 (シフトパターンなし); その他
it: Tipo di incisione del cambio: 10 marce; 5 marce; 6 marce; 7 marce; 8 marce; Automatico PRND; Automatico PRNDL; Automatico PRNDM; Vuoto (nessuno schema marce); Altro
ru: Тип схемы переключения передач: 10 скоростей; 5 скоростей; 6 скоростей; 7 скоростей; 8 скоростей; Автомат PRND; Автомат PRNDL; Автомат PRNDM; Пустая (без схемы переключения); Другое
de: Typ des Schaltschemas: 10-Gang; 5-Gang; 6-Gang; 7-Gang; 8-Gang; Automatik PRND; Automatik PRNDL; Automatik PRNDM; Leer (kein Schaltschema); Sonstige
nl: Schakelpatroon type: 10-versnellingen; 5-versnellingen; 6-versnellingen; 7-versnellingen; 8-versnellingen; Automaat PRND; Automaat PRNDL; Automaat PRNDM; Blanco (geen schakelpatroon); Overig
tr: Vites deseni tipi: 10 vites; 5 vites; 6 vites; 7 vites; 8 vites; Otomatik PRND; Otomatik PRNDL; Otomatik PRNDM; Boş (vites şeması yok); Diğer
hr-HR: Vrsta uzorka mijenjanja brzina: 10 brzina; 5 brzina; 6 brzina; 7 brzina; 8 brzina; Automatik PRND; Automatik PRNDL; Automatik PRNDM; Prazno (bez sheme brzina); Drugo
en: Shift pattern type: 10-speed; 5-speed; 6-speed; 7-speed; 8-speed; Automatic PRND; Automatic PRNDL; Automatic PRNDM; Blank (no shift pattern); Other
ko: 변속 패턴 유형: 10단; 5단; 6단; 7단; 8단; 자동 PRND; 자동 PRNDL; 자동 PRNDM; 블랭크(시프트 패턴 없음); 기타
lt-LT: Pavarų schemos tipas: 10 pavarų; 5 pavarų; 6 pavarų; 7 pavarų; 8 pavarų; Automatinė PRND; Automatinė PRNDL; Automatinė PRNDM; Tuščia (be pavarų schemos); Kita
pt-BR: Padrão de câmbio tipo: 10 marchas; 5 marchas; 6 marchas; 7 marchas; 8 marchas; Automático PRND; Automático PRNDL; Automático PRNDM; Liso (sem padrão de marcha); Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta sheme prestavljanja: 10 prestav; 5 prestav; 6 prestav; 7 prestav; 8 prestav; Avtomatski PRND; Avtomatski PRNDL; Avtomatski PRNDM; Prazno (brez vzorca); Drugo
hu: Váltó kiosztás típusa: 10-sebességes; 5-sebességes; 6-sebességes; 7-sebességes; 8-sebességes; Automata PRND; Automata PRNDL; Automata PRNDM; Üres (nincs sebességfokozat-kiosztás); Egyéb
fr: Type de marquage des vitesses: 10 vitesses; 5 vitesses; 6 vitesses; 7 vitesses; 8 vitesses; Automatique PRND; Automatique PRNDL; Automatique PRNDM; Vierge (sans grille de vitesse); Autre